isv_lat_hunspell_dict.aff
FLAG long
SFX Fq Y 72
SFX Fq  se 0 .
SFX Fq sti se dl .
SFX Fq sti se dla .
SFX Fq sti se dlo .
SFX Fq sti se dli .
SFX Fq sti se m .
SFX Fq sti se š .
SFX Fq sti se 0 .
SFX Fq sti se mo .
SFX Fq sti se te .
SFX Fq sti se dut .
SFX Fq sti se deh .
SFX Fq sti se deše .
SFX Fq sti se dehmo .
SFX Fq sti se deste .
SFX Fq sti se dehu .
SFX Fq sti se d .
SFX Fq sti se dmo .
SFX Fq sti se dte .
SFX Fq sti se duči .
SFX Fq sti se dučego .
SFX Fq sti se dučemu .
SFX Fq sti se dučim .
SFX Fq sti se dučem .
SFX Fq sti se dučih .
SFX Fq sti se dučimi .
SFX Fq sti se duča .
SFX Fq sti se duču .
SFX Fq sti se dučej .
SFX Fq sti se dučeju .
SFX Fq sti se duče .
SFX Fq sti se domy .
SFX Fq sti se domogo .
SFX Fq sti se domomu .
SFX Fq sti se domym .
SFX Fq sti se domom .
SFX Fq sti se domo .
SFX Fq sti se doma .
SFX Fq sti se domu .
SFX Fq sti se domoj .
SFX Fq sti se domoju .
SFX Fq sti se domi .
SFX Fq sti se dome .
SFX Fq sti se domyh .
SFX Fq sti se domym .
SFX Fq sti se domymi .
SFX Fq sti se domo .
SFX Fq sti se dši .
SFX Fq sti se dša .
SFX Fq sti se dše .
SFX Fq sti se deny .
SFX Fq sti se denogo .
SFX Fq sti se denomu .
SFX Fq sti se denym .
SFX Fq sti se denom .
SFX Fq sti se deni .
SFX Fq sti se dene .
SFX Fq sti se denyh .
SFX Fq sti se denymi .
SFX Fq sti se dena .
SFX Fq sti se denu .
SFX Fq sti se denoj .
SFX Fq sti se denoju .
SFX Fq sti se deno .
SFX Fq sti se denje .
SFX Fq sti se denja .
SFX Fq sti se denju .
SFX Fq sti se denjem .
SFX Fq sti se denij .
SFX Fq sti se denjam .
SFX Fq sti se denjami .
SFX Fq sti se denjah .

SFX Fr Y 80
SFX Fr ti l .
SFX Fr ti la .
SFX Fr ti lo .
SFX Fr ti li .
SFX Fr skočiti u .
SFX Fr skočiti em .
SFX Fr skočiti eš .
SFX Fr skočiti e .
SFX Fr skočiti emo .
SFX Fr skočiti ete .
SFX Fr skočiti ut .
SFX Fr ti h .
SFX Fr ti še .
SFX Fr ti hmo .
SFX Fr ti ste .
SFX Fr ti hu .
SFX Fr skočiti j .
SFX Fr skočiti jmo .
SFX Fr skočiti jte .
SFX Fr skočiti juči .
SFX Fr skočiti jučego .
SFX Fr skočiti jučemu .
SFX Fr skočiti jučim .
SFX Fr skočiti jučem .
SFX Fr skočiti jučih .
SFX Fr skočiti jučimi .
SFX Fr skočiti juča .
SFX Fr skočiti juču .
SFX Fr skočiti jučej .
SFX Fr skočiti jučeju .
SFX Fr skočiti juče .
SFX Fr skočiti emy .
SFX Fr skočiti emogo .
SFX Fr skočiti emomu .
SFX Fr skočiti emym .
SFX Fr skočiti emom .
SFX Fr skočiti emo .
SFX Fr skočiti ema .
SFX Fr skočiti emu .
SFX Fr skočiti emoj .
SFX Fr skočiti emoju .
SFX Fr skočiti emi .
SFX Fr skočiti eme .
SFX Fr skočiti emyh .
SFX Fr skočiti emym .
SFX Fr skočiti emymi .
SFX Fr ti vši .
SFX Fr ti všego .
SFX Fr ti všemu .
SFX Fr ti všim .
SFX Fr ti všem .
SFX Fr ti vših .
SFX Fr ti všimi .
SFX Fr ti vša .
SFX Fr ti všu .
SFX Fr ti všej .
SFX Fr ti všeju .
SFX Fr ti vše .
SFX Fr iti eny .
SFX Fr iti enogo .
SFX Fr iti enomu .
SFX Fr iti enym .
SFX Fr iti enom .
SFX Fr iti eni .
SFX Fr iti ene .
SFX Fr iti enyh .
SFX Fr iti enymi .
SFX Fr iti ena .
SFX Fr iti enu .
SFX Fr iti enoj .
SFX Fr iti enoju .
SFX Fr iti eno .
SFX Fr iti enje .
SFX Fr iti enja .
SFX Fr iti enju .
SFX Fr iti enjem .
SFX Fr iti enij .
SFX Fr iti enjam .
SFX Fr iti enjami .
SFX Fr iti enjah .

SFX Fs Y 69
SFX Fs  se 0 .
SFX Fs ti se l .
SFX Fs ti se la .
SFX Fs ti se lo .
SFX Fs ti se li .
SFX Fs ati se ju .
SFX Fs ati se im .
SFX Fs ati se iš .
SFX Fs ati se i .
SFX Fs ati se imo .
SFX Fs ati se ite .
SFX Fs ati se et .
SFX Fs ti se h .
SFX Fs ti se še .
SFX Fs ti se hmo .
SFX Fs ti se ste .
SFX Fs ti se hu .
SFX Fs ati se eči .
SFX Fs ati se eča .
SFX Fs ati se eče .
SFX Fs ati se imy .
SFX Fs ati se imogo .
SFX Fs ati se imomu .
SFX Fs ati se imym .
SFX Fs ati se imom .
SFX Fs ati se imo .
SFX Fs ati se ima .
SFX Fs ati se imu .
SFX Fs ati se imoj .
SFX Fs ati se imoju .
SFX Fs ati se imi .
SFX Fs ati se ime .
SFX Fs ati se imyh .
SFX Fs ati se imym .
SFX Fs ati se imymi .
SFX Fs ti se vši .
SFX Fs ti se všego .
SFX Fs ti se všemu .
SFX Fs ti se všim .
SFX Fs ti se všem .
SFX Fs ti se vših .
SFX Fs ti se všimi .
SFX Fs ti se vša .
SFX Fs ti se všu .
SFX Fs ti se všej .
SFX Fs ti se všeju .
SFX Fs ti se vše .
SFX Fs ti se ny .
SFX Fs ti se nogo .
SFX Fs ti se nomu .
SFX Fs ti se nym .
SFX Fs ti se nom .
SFX Fs ti se ni .
SFX Fs ti se ne .
SFX Fs ti se nyh .
SFX Fs ti se nymi .
SFX Fs ti se na .
SFX Fs ti se nu .
SFX Fs ti se noj .
SFX Fs ti se noju .
SFX Fs ti se no .
SFX Fs ti se nje .
SFX Fs ti se nja .
SFX Fs ti se nju .
SFX Fs ti se njem .
SFX Fs ti se nij .
SFX Fs ti se njam .
SFX Fs ti se njami .
SFX Fs ti se njah .

SFX Ft Y 80
SFX Ft ti l .
SFX Ft ti la .
SFX Ft ti lo .
SFX Ft ti li .
SFX Ft tati ču .
SFX Ft tati čem .
SFX Ft tati češ .
SFX Ft tati če .
SFX Ft tati čemo .
SFX Ft tati čete .
SFX Ft tati čut .
SFX Ft ti h .
SFX Ft ti še .
SFX Ft ti hmo .
SFX Ft ti ste .
SFX Ft ti hu .
SFX Ft tati či .
SFX Ft tati čimo .
SFX Ft tati čite .
SFX Ft tati čuči .
SFX Ft tati čučego .
SFX Ft tati čučemu .
SFX Ft tati čučim .
SFX Ft tati čučem .
SFX Ft tati čučih .
SFX Ft tati čučimi .
SFX Ft tati čuča .
SFX Ft tati čuču .
SFX Ft tati čučej .
SFX Ft tati čučeju .
SFX Ft tati čuče .
SFX Ft tati čemy .
SFX Ft tati čemogo .
SFX Ft tati čemomu .
SFX Ft tati čemym .
SFX Ft tati čemom .
SFX Ft tati čemo .
SFX Ft tati čema .
SFX Ft tati čemu .
SFX Ft tati čemoj .
SFX Ft tati čemoju .
SFX Ft tati čemi .
SFX Ft tati čeme .
SFX Ft tati čemyh .
SFX Ft tati čemym .
SFX Ft tati čemymi .
SFX Ft ti vši .
SFX Ft ti všego .
SFX Ft ti všemu .
SFX Ft ti všim .
SFX Ft ti všem .
SFX Ft ti vših .
SFX Ft ti všimi .
SFX Ft ti vša .
SFX Ft ti všu .
SFX Ft ti všej .
SFX Ft ti všeju .
SFX Ft ti vše .
SFX Ft ti ny .
SFX Ft ti nogo .
SFX Ft ti nomu .
SFX Ft ti nym .
SFX Ft ti nom .
SFX Ft ti ni .
SFX Ft ti ne .
SFX Ft ti nyh .
SFX Ft ti nymi .
SFX Ft ti na .
SFX Ft ti nu .
SFX Ft ti noj .
SFX Ft ti noju .
SFX Ft ti no .
SFX Ft ti nje .
SFX Ft ti nja .
SFX Ft ti nju .
SFX Ft ti njem .
SFX Ft ti nij .
SFX Ft ti njam .
SFX Ft ti njami .
SFX Ft ti njah .

SFX Fu Y 69
SFX Fu  se 0 .
SFX Fu ti se l .
SFX Fu ti se la .
SFX Fu ti se lo .
SFX Fu ti se li .
SFX Fu ěti se ju .
SFX Fu ěti se im .
SFX Fu ěti se iš .
SFX Fu ěti se i .
SFX Fu ěti se imo .
SFX Fu ěti se ite .
SFX Fu ěti se et .
SFX Fu ti se h .
SFX Fu ti se še .
SFX Fu ti se hmo .
SFX Fu ti se ste .
SFX Fu ti se hu .
SFX Fu ěti se eči .
SFX Fu ěti se eča .
SFX Fu ěti se eče .
SFX Fu ěti se imy .
SFX Fu ěti se imogo .
SFX Fu ěti se imomu .
SFX Fu ěti se imym .
SFX Fu ěti se imom .
SFX Fu ěti se imo .
SFX Fu ěti se ima .
SFX Fu ěti se imu .
SFX Fu ěti se imoj .
SFX Fu ěti se imoju .
SFX Fu ěti se imi .
SFX Fu ěti se ime .
SFX Fu ěti se imyh .
SFX Fu ěti se imym .
SFX Fu ěti se imymi .
SFX Fu ti se vši .
SFX Fu ti se všego .
SFX Fu ti se všemu .
SFX Fu ti se všim .
SFX Fu ti se všem .
SFX Fu ti se vših .
SFX Fu ti se všimi .
SFX Fu ti se vša .
SFX Fu ti se všu .
SFX Fu ti se všej .
SFX Fu ti se všeju .
SFX Fu ti se vše .
SFX Fu ti se ny .
SFX Fu ti se nogo .
SFX Fu ti se nomu .
SFX Fu ti se nym .
SFX Fu ti se nom .
SFX Fu ti se ni .
SFX Fu ti se ne .
SFX Fu ti se nyh .
SFX Fu ti se nymi .
SFX Fu ti se na .
SFX Fu ti se nu .
SFX Fu ti se noj .
SFX Fu ti se noju .
SFX Fu ti se no .
SFX Fu ti se nje .
SFX Fu ti se nja .
SFX Fu ti se nju .
SFX Fu ti se njem .
SFX Fu ti se nij .
SFX Fu ti se njam .
SFX Fu ti se njami .
SFX Fu ti se njah .
