isv_lat_hunspell_dict.dic
najesti se/Fq
naskočiti/Fr
naspati se/Fs
našeptati/Ft
natrpěti se/Fu
objesti se/Fq
obozrěti se/Fu
vyspati se/Fs
zaspati se/Fs
šeptati/Ft
ščekotati/Ft
loskotati/Ft
